Georgia, session 2025_26, HB173.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Part 3 of Article 16 of Chapter 2 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to student health in elementary and secondary education, is amended by revising
Code Section 20-2-778, relating to required information to parents of students regarding
meningococcal meningitis and influenza and their respective vaccines, as follows:
"20-2-778.
(a) Beginning in the 2025-2026 school year, the Department of Education shall provide
all parents and guardians of students entering the seventh grade with information on
recommended adolescent vaccinations for meningococcal meningitis disease, human
H. B. 173 (SUB)
- 1 -

LC 57 0233S
papillomavirus (HPV), and tetanus, diphtheria, and pertussis (TDAP). Such information
shall be provided in print form, electronic form, or both print and electronic form and shall
include:
(1) Information on each vaccine and how it prevents the associated disease or diseases;
(2) A list of sources for additional information; and
(3) Related recommendations issued by the Advisory Committee on Immunization
Practices of the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.
(b) If a local board of education provides information on immunizations, infectious
diseases, medications, or other school health issues to parents and guardians of students in
grades six seven through 12, then the following information about meningococcal
meningitis disease and influenza and their respective vaccines shall be included:
(1) A description of causes, symptoms, and means of transmission;
(2) A list of sources for additional information; and
(3) Related recommendations issued by the Advisory Committee on Immunization
Practices of the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.
(b)(c) The Department of Education, in cooperation with the Department of Public Health,
shall develop and make available to local school systems the information about
meningococcal meningitis disease and influenza and their respective vaccines to local
school systems as required under subsection subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section
in an efficient manner that shall include posting the information on its public website."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 173 (SUB)
- 2 -